Utah statutes.
36-1-105.   Uncertain boundaries -- How resolved.
(1)  As used in this section, "affected party" means:
(a)  a senator whose Utah State Senate district boundary is uncertain because
the identifying feature used to establish the district boundary has been
removed, modified, or is unable to be identified or who is uncertain about
whether or not he or another person resides in a particular Senate district;
(b)  a candidate for senator whose Senate district boundary is uncertain
because the identifying feature used to establish the district boundary has
been removed, modified, or is unable to be identified or who is uncertain
about whether or not he or another person resides in a particular Senate
district; or
(c)  a person who is uncertain about which Senate district contains the
person's residence because the identifying feature used to establish the
district boundary has been removed, modified, or is unable to be identified.
(2) (a)  An affected party may file a written request petitioning the
lieutenant governor to determine:
(i)  the precise location of the Senate district boundary;
(ii)  the number of the Senate district in which a person resides; or
(iii)  both Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (ii).
(b)  In order to make the determination required by Subsection (2)(a), the
lieutenant governor shall review the official maps and obtain and review other
relevant data such as census block and tract descriptions, aerial photographs,
aerial maps, or other data about the area.
(c)  Within five days of receipt of the request, the lieutenant governor shall
review the maps, obtain and review any relevant data, and make a
determination.
(d)  When the lieutenant governor determines the location of the Senate
district boundary, the lieutenant governor shall:
(i)  prepare a certification identifying the appropriate boundary and
attaching a map, if necessary; and
(ii)  send a copy of the certification to:
(A)  the affected party;
(B)  the county clerk of the affected county; and
(C)  the Automated Geographic Reference Center created under Section
63F-1-506.
(e)  If the lieutenant governor determines the number of the Senate district
in which a particular person resides, the lieutenant governor shall send a
letter identifying that district by number to:
(i)  the person;
(ii)  the affected party who filed the petition, if different than the person
whose Senate district number was identified; and
(iii)  the county clerk of the affected county.
